Maryland, session 2026, HB0529.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 15–103.1 through 15–103.8 of Article – Health – General of the Annotated
Code of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 15–103.3 through 15–103.10,
respectively.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
– 1 –

Ch. 865 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Article – Health – General
5–615.
(c) (2) The information sheet developed by the Department under this
subsection shall be provided by:
(vi) A managed care organization in accordance with [§ 15–103] §
15–103.1(I)(1)(XVII) of this article;
15–102.5.
(a) Subject to [§ 15–103(f)] § 15–103.1(DD) of this subtitle, a health maintenance
organization that requires its panel providers to participate in a managed care organization
shall establish a mechanism, subject to review by the Secretary, which provides for
equitable distribution of enrollees and which ensures that a provider will not be assigned a
disproportionate number of enrollees.
15–103.
(a) [(1)] The Secretary shall administer the Maryland Medical Assistance
Program.
[(2)] (B) The Program:
[(i)] (1) Subject to the limitations of the State budget, shall provide
medical and other health care services for indigent individuals or medically indigent
individuals or both;
[(ii)] (2) Shall provide, subject to the limitations of the State budget
AND AS PERMITTED BY FEDERAL LAW, comprehensive medical, dental, and other health
care services, including services provided in accordance with § 15–141.5 of this subtitle, for
all eligible pregnant women whose family income is at or below [250 percent] 250% of the
poverty level for the duration of the pregnancy and for 1 year immediately following the
end of the woman’s pregnancy[, as permitted by the federal law];
[(iii)] (3) Shall provide, subject to the limitations of the State budget
AND AS PERMITTED BY FEDERAL LAW, comprehensive medical and other health care
services for all eligible children currently under the age of 1 YEAR whose family income
falls below [185 percent] 185% of the poverty level[, as permitted by federal law];
[(iv)] (4) Beginning on January 1, 2012, shall provide, subject to the
limitations of the State budget AND AS PERMITTED BY FEDERAL LAW, family planning
services to all women whose family income is at or below [200 percent] 200% of the poverty
level[, as permitted by federal law];
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 865
[(v)] (5) Shall provide, subject to the limitations of the State budget
AND AS PERMITTED BY FEDERAL LAW, comprehensive medical and other health care
services for all children [from the age of] WHO ARE AT LEAST 1 year [up through and
including] OLD AND UNDER the age of 5 years whose family income falls below [133
percent] 133% of the poverty level[, as permitted by the federal law];
[(vi)] (6) Beginning on January 1, 2014, shall provide, subject to the
limitations of the State budget AND AS PERMITTED BY FEDERAL LAW, comprehensive
medical care and other health care services for all children who are at least 6 years [of age
but are] OLD AND under THE AGE OF 19 years [of age] whose family income falls below
[133 percent] 133% of the poverty level[, as permitted by federal law];
[(vii)] (7) Shall provide, subject to the limitations of the State budget
AND AS PERMITTED BY FEDERAL LAW, comprehensive medical care and other health
care services for all legal immigrants who meet Program eligibility standards and who
arrived in the United States before August 22, 1996, the effective date of the federal
Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act[, as permitted by federal
law];
[(viii)] (8) Shall provide, subject to the limitations of the State budget
and any other requirements imposed by the State, comprehensive medical care and other
health care services for all legal immigrant children under the age of 18 years and pregnant
women who meet Program eligibility standards and who arrived in the United States on or
after August 22, 1996, the effective date of the federal Personal Responsibility and Work
Opportunity Reconciliation Act;
[(ix)] (9) Beginning on January 1, 2014, shall provide, subject to the
limitations of the State budget, and as permitted by federal law, medical care and other
health care services for adults whose annual household income is at or below [133 percent]
133% of the poverty level;
[(x)] (10) Subject to the limitations of the State budget, and as
permitted by federal law:
[1.] (I) Shall provide comprehensive medical care, dental
care, and other health care services for former foster care adolescents who, on their 18th
birthday, were in foster care under the responsibility of the State and are not otherwise
eligible for Program benefits; and
[2.] (II) May provide comprehensive medical care, dental
care, and other health care services for former foster care adolescents who, on their 18th
birthday, were in foster care under the responsibility of any other state or the District of
Columbia;
– 3 –

Ch. 865 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(xi)] (11) May include bedside nursing care for eligible Program
recipients;
[(xii)] (12) Shall provide services in accordance with funding
restrictions included in the annual State budget bill;
[(xiii) 1. Beginning on January 1, 2019, may provide, subject to the
limitations of the State budget, and as permitted by federal law, dental services for adults
whose annual household income is at or below 133 percent of the poverty level; and]
[2.] (13) Beginning on January 1, 2023, shall provide,
subject to the limitations of the State budget, and as permitted by federal law, dental
services for adults, including diagnostic, preventive, restorative, and periodontal services,
whose annual household income is at or below 133 percent of the federal poverty level;
[(xiv)] (14) Shall provide, subject to the limitations of the State
budget, medically appropriate drugs that are approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration for the treatment of hepatitis C, regardless of the fibrosis score, and that
are determined to be medically necessary;
[(xv)] (15) Shall provide, subject to the limitations of the State
budget, health care services appropriately delivered through telehealth to a patient in
accordance with § 15–141.2 of this subtitle;
[(xvi)] (16) Beginning on January 1, 2021, shall provide, subject to the
limitations of the State budget and § 15–855(b)(2) of the Insurance Article, and as permitted
by federal law, services for pediatric autoimmune neuropsychiatric disorders associated
with streptococcal infections and pediatric acute onset neuropsychiatric syndrome,
including the use of intravenous immunoglobulin therapy, for eligible Program recipients,
if pediatric autoimmune neuropsychiatric disorders associated with streptococcal infections
and pediatric acute onset neuropsychiatric syndrome are coded for billing and diagnosis
purposes in accordance with § 15–855(d) of the Insurance Article;
[(xvii)] (17) Beginning on January 1, 2022, may not include, subject to
federal approval and limitations of the State budget, a frequency limitation on covered
dental prophylaxis care or oral health exams that requires the dental prophylaxis care or
oral health exams to be provided at an interval greater than 120 days within a plan year;
[(xviii)] (18) Shall provide, subject to the limitations of the State
budget, comprehensive medical care and other health care services to noncitizen pregnant
women who would be eligible for the Program but for their immigration status and to their
children up to the age of 1 year;
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 865
[(xix)] (19) Shall provide coverage of abortion care services to
Program recipients in the manner described in § 15–857(b)(1)(ii) and (2) of the Insurance
Article;
[(xx)] (20) Beginning on July 1, 2023, shall provide, subject to federal
approval and limitations of the State budget, community violence prevention services in
accordance with § 15–141.3 of this subtitle;
[(xxi)] (21) Beginning on January 1, 2023, shall provide, subject to the
limitations of the State budget, and as permitted by federal law, coverage for self–measured
blood pressure monitoring for all Program recipients diagnosed with uncontrolled high
blood pressure, including:
[1.] (I) The provision of validated home blood pressure
monitors; and
[2.] (II) Reimbursement of health care provider and other
staff time used for patient training, transmission of blood pressure data, interpretation of
blood pressure readings and reporting, and the delivery of co–interventions, including
educational materials or classes, behavioral change management, and medication
management;
[(xxii)] (22) Beginning on January 1, 2024, shall provide
gender–affirming treatment in accordance with § 15–151 of this subtitle;
[(xxiii)] (23) Beginning on July 1, 2025, shall provide, subject to the
limitations of the State budget, and as permitted by federal law, coverage for biomarker
testing in accordance with § 15–859 of the Insurance Article;
[(xxiv)] (24) Beginning on January 1, 2025, shall provide coverage for
prostheses in accordance with § 15–844 of the Insurance Article;
[(xxv)] (25) Beginning on January 1, 2026, shall provide, subject to the
limitations of the State budget, and as permitted by federal law, coverage for self–measured
blood pressure monitoring for eligible Program recipients in accordance with § 15–141.6 of
this subtitle;
[(xxvi)] (26) Beginning on January 1, 2026, shall provide coverage for
a transfer to a special pediatric hospital in accordance with § 15–861 of the Insurance
Article;
[(xxvii)] (27) Beginning on January 1, 2026, if providing coverage
for the delivery of anesthesia, shall provide coverage for the delivery of anesthesia in
accordance with § 15–862 of the Insurance Article; and
– 5 –

Ch. 865 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(xxviii)] (28) Beginning on January 1, 2026, shall provide
calcium score testing in accordance with § 15–863 of the Insurance Article.
[(3)] (C) Subject to restrictions in federal law or waivers, the Department
may:
[(i)] (1) Impose cost–sharing on Program recipients; and
[(ii)] (2) For adults who do not meet requirements for a federal
category of eligibility for Medicaid:
[1.] (I) Cap enrollment; and
[2.] (II) Limit the benefit package.
[(4)] (D) Subject to the limitations of the State budget, the Department
shall implement the provisions of Title II of the federal Patient Protection and Affordable
Care Act, as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010,
to include:
[(i)] (1) Parents and caretaker relatives who have a dependent
child living in the parents’ or caretaker relatives’ home; and
[(ii)] (2) Adults who do not meet requirements, such as age,
disability, or parent or caretaker relative of a dependent child, for a federal category of
eligibility for Medicaid and who are not enrolled in the federal Medicare program, as
enacted by Title XVII of the Social Security Act.
[(5)] (E) (1) On or before January 1, 2025, subject to the limitations of
the State budget, and as permitted by federal law, the Department:
(i) Shall establish an Express Lane Eligibility Program to enroll
individuals in the [Maryland Medical Assistance] Program and Maryland Children’s
Health Program based on eligibility findings by the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance
Program;
(ii) May not consider any other income or eligibility requirements;
(iii) To the extent that a waiver is needed to maximize the number of
State residents who may qualify for the Express Lane Eligibility Program, shall apply to
the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for one or more waivers under § 1115 of
the federal Social Security Act to implement the Express Lane Eligibility Program; and
(iv) [Shall] SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
SHALL make all reasonable efforts to expedite enrollment of eligible individuals in the
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 865
Express Lane Eligibility Program[, provided that the Department may propose or
implement the use of Express Lane Eligibility for renewals before proposing or
implementing the use of Express Lane Eligibility for initial enrollment].
(2) THE DEPARTMENT MAY PROPOSE OR IMPLEMENT THE USE OF
EXPRESS LANE ELIGIBILITY FOR RENEWALS BEFORE PROPOSING OR
IMPLEMENTING THE USE OF EXPRESS LANE ELIGIBILITY FOR INITIAL
ENROLLMENT.
[(b) (1) As permitted by federal law or waiver, the Secretary may establish a
program under which Program recipients are required to enroll in managed care
organizations.
(2) (i) The benefits required by the program developed under
paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be adopted by regulation and shall be equivalent to
the benefit level required by the Maryland Medical Assistance Program on January 1, 1996.
(ii) Subject to the limitations of the State budget and as permitted
by federal law or waiver, the Department shall provide reimbursement for medically
necessary and appropriate inpatient, intermediate care, and halfway house substance
abuse treatment services for substance abusing enrollees 21 years of age or older who are
recipients of temporary cash assistance under the Family Investment Program.
(iii) Each managed care organization participating in the program
developed under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall provide or arrange for the provision
of the benefits described in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph.
(iv) Nothing in this paragraph may be construed to prohibit a
managed care organization from offering additional benefits, if the managed care
organization is not receiving capitation payments based on the provision of the additional
benefits.
(v) Notwithstanding subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, the benefits
required by the program developed under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall include
dental services for pregnant women.
(3) Subject to the limitations of the State budget and as permitted by
federal law or waiver, the program developed under paragraph (1) of this subsection and
the program developed under § 15–301 of this title may provide guaranteed eligibility for
each enrollee for up to 6 months, unless an enrollee obtains health insurance through
another source.
(4) (i) The Secretary may exclude specific populations or services from
the program developed under paragraph (1) of this subsection.
– 7 –

Ch. 865 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) For any populations or services excluded under this paragraph,
the Secretary may authorize a managed care organization, to provide the services or
provide for the population, including authorization of a separate dental managed care
organization or a managed care organization to provide services to Program recipients with
special needs.
(5) (i) Except for a service excluded by the Secretary under paragraph
(4) of this subsection, each managed care organization shall provide all the benefits
required by regulations adopted under paragraph (2) of this subsection.
(ii) For a population or service excluded by the Secretary under
paragraph (4) of this subsection, the Secretary may authorize a managed care organization
to provide only for that population or provide only that service.
(iii) A managed care organization may subcontract specified required
services to a health care provider that is licensed or authorized to provide those services.
(6) Except for the Program of All–inclusive Care for the Elderly (“PACE”)
Program, the Secretary may not include the long–term care population or long–term care
services in the program developed under paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(7) The program developed under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall
ensure that enrollees have access to a pharmacy that:
(i) Is licensed in the State; and
(ii) Is within a reasonable distance from the enrollee’s residence.
(8) For cause, the Department may disenroll enrollees from a managed
care organization and enroll them in another managed care organization.
(9) Each managed care organization shall:
(i) Have a quality assurance program in effect which is subject to
the approval of the Department and which, at a minimum:
1. Complies with any health care quality improvement
system developed by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services;
2. Complies with the quality requirements of applicable
State licensure laws and regulations;
3. Complies with practice guidelines and protocols specified
by the Department;
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 865
4. Provides for an enrollee grievance system, including an
enrollee hotline;
5. Provides a provider grievance system;
6. Provides for enrollee and provider satisfaction surveys, to
be taken at least annually;
7. Provides for a consumer advisory board to receive regular
input from enrollees;
8. Provides for an annual consumer advisory board report to
be submitted to the Secretary; and
9. Complies with specific quality, access, data, and
performance measurements adopted by the Department for treating enrollees with special
needs;
(ii) Submit to the Department:
1. Service–specific data by service type in a format to be
established by the Department;
2. Utilization and outcome reports, such as the Health Plan
Employer Data and Information Set (HEDIS), as directed by the Department; and
3. At least semiannually, aggregate data that includes:
A. The number of enrollees provided with substance abuse
treatment services; and
B. The amount of money spent on substance abuse
treatment;
(iii) Promote timely access to and continuity of health care services
for enrollees;
(iv) Demonstrate organizational capacity to provide special
programs, including outreach, case management, and home visiting, tailored to meet the
individual needs of all enrollees;
(v) Provide assistance to enrollees in securing necessary health care
services;
– 9 –

Ch. 865 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(vi) Provide or assure alcohol and drug abuse treatment for
substance abusing pregnant women and all other enrollees of managed care organizations
who require these services;
(vii) Educate enrollees on health care prevention and good health
habits;
(viii) Assure necessary provider capacity in all geographic areas under
contract;
(ix) Be accountable and hold its subcontractors accountable for
standards established by the Department and, upon failure to meet those standards, be
subject to one or more of the following penalties:
1. Fines;
2. Suspension of further enrollments;
3. Withholding of all or part of the capitation payment;
4. Termination of the contract;
5. Disqualification from future participation in the Program;
and
6. Any other penalties that may be imposed by the
Department;
(x) Subject to applicable federal and State law, include incentives for
enrollees to comply with provisions of the managed care organization;
(xi) Provide or arrange to provide primary mental health services;
(xii) Provide or arrange to provide all Medicaid–covered services
required to comply with State statutes and regulations mandating health and mental
health services for children in State supervised care:
1. According to standards set by the Department; and
2. Locally, to the extent the services are available locally;
(xiii) Submit to the Department aggregate information from the
quality assurance program, including complaints and resolutions from the enrollee and
provider grievance systems, the enrollee hotline, and enrollee satisfaction surveys;
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 865
(xiv) Maintain as part of the enrollee’s medical record the following
information:
1. The basic health risk assessment conducted on
enrollment;
2. Any information the managed care organization receives
that results from an assessment of the enrollee conducted for the purpose of any early
intervention, evaluation, planning, or case management program;
3. Information from the local department of social services
regarding any other service or benefit the enrollee receives, including assistance or benefits
from a program administered by the Department of Human Services under the Human
Services Article; and
4. Any information the managed care organization receives
from a school–based clinic, a core services agency, a local health department, or any other
person that has provided health services to the enrollee;
(xv) Upon provision of information specified by the Department
under paragraph (19) of this subsection, pay school–based clinics for services provided to
the managed care organization’s enrollees;
(xvi) In coordination with participating dentists, enrollees, and
families of enrollees, develop a process to arrange to provide dental therapeutic treatment
to individuals under 21 years of age that requires:
1. A participating dentist to notify a managed care
organization when an enrollee is in need of therapeutic treatment and the dentist is unable
to provide the treatment;
2. A managed care organization to provide the enrollee or the
family of the enrollee with a list of participating providers who offer therapeutic dental
services; and
3. A managed care organization to notify the enrollee or the
family of the enrollee that the managed care organization will provide further assistance if
the enrollee has difficulty obtaining an appointment with a provider of therapeutic dental
services;
(xvii) Provide the advance directive information sheet developed under
§ 5–615 of this article:
1. To all enrollees at the time of initial enrollment and in the
managed care organization’s enrollee publications;
– 11 –

Ch. 865 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2. If the managed care organization maintains a website, on
the managed care organization’s website; and
3. At the request of an enrollee; and
(xviii) If a managed care organization maintains a website, after the tab
on the State–designated health information exchange website required under §
19–145(b)(2)(iv) of this article is developed, provide a link to the webpage that is accessed
through the tab.
(10) The Department shall adopt regulations that assure that managed care
organizations employ appropriate personnel to:
(i) Assure that individuals with special needs obtain needed
services; and
(ii) Coordinate those services.
(11) (i) A managed care organization shall reimburse a hospital
emergency facility and provider for:
1. Health care services that meet the definition of emergency
services in § 19–701 of this article;
2. Medical screening services rendered to meet the
requirements of the federal Emergency Medical Treatment and Active Labor Act;
3. Medically necessary services if the managed care
organization authorized, referred, or otherwise allowed the enrollee to use the emergency
facility and the medically necessary services are related to the condition for which the
enrollee was allowed to use the emergency facility; and
4. Medically necessary services that relate to the condition
presented and that are provided by the provider in the emergency facility to the enrollee if
the managed care organization fails to provide 24–hour access to a physician as required
by the Department.
(ii) A provider may not be required to obtain prior authorization or
approval for payment from a managed care organization in order to obtain reimbursement
under this paragraph.
(12) (i) Each managed care organization shall notify each enrollee when
the enrollee should obtain an immunization, examination, or other wellness service.
(ii) Each managed care organization shall:
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 865
1. Maintain evidence of compliance with paragraph (9) of
this subsection; and
2. Provide to the Department, upon initial application to
provide health care services to enrollees and on an annual basis thereafter, evidence of
compliance with paragraph (9) of this subsection, including submission of a written plan.
(iii) A managed care organization that does not comply with
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph for at least 90% of its new enrollees:
1. Within 90 days of their enrollment may not receive more
than 80% of its capitation payments;
2. Within 180 days of their enrollment may not receive more
than 70% of its capitation payments; and
3. Within 270 days of their enrollment may not receive more
than 50% of its capitation payments.
(iv) If a managed care organization does not comply with the
requirements of paragraph (9) of this subsection, the Department may contract with any
community–based health organization that the Department determines is willing and able
to perform comprehensive outreach services to enrollees.
(v) In addition to the provisions of subparagraph (iv) of this
paragraph, if a managed care organization does not comply with the requirements of
paragraph (9) of this subsection or fails to provide evidence of compliance to the Department
under subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the Department may:
1. Impose a fine on the managed care organization which
shall be deposited in the HealthChoice Performance Incentive Fund established under §
15–103.3 of this subtitle;
2. Suspend further enrollment into the managed care
organization;
3. Withhold all or part of the capitation rate from the
managed care organization;
4. Terminate the provider agreement; or
5. Disqualify the managed care organization from future
participation in the Maryland Medicaid Managed Care Program.
(13) The Department shall:
– 13 –

Ch. 865 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) Establish and maintain an ombudsman program and a locally
accessible enrollee hotline;
(ii) Perform focused medical reviews of managed care organizations
that include reviews of how the managed care organizations are providing health care
services to special populations;
(iii) Provide timely feedback to each managed care organization on
its compliance with the Department’s quality and access system;
(iv) Establish and maintain within the Department a process for
handling provider complaints about managed care organizations; and
(v) Adopt regulations relating to appeals by managed care
organizations of penalties imposed by the Department, including regulations providing for
an appeal to the Office of Administrative Hearings.
(14) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph, the
Department shall delegate responsibility for maintaining the ombudsman program for a
county to that county’s local health department on the request of the local health
department.
(ii) A local health department may not subcontract the ombudsman
program.
(iii) Before the Department delegates responsibility to a local health
department to maintain the ombudsman program for a county, a local health department
that is also a Medicaid provider must receive the approval of the Secretary and the local
governing body.
(15) A managed care organization may not:
(i) Without authorization by the Department, enroll an individual
who at the time is a Program recipient; or
(ii) Have face–to–face or telephone contact, or otherwise solicit with
an individual who at the time is a Program recipient before the Program recipient enrolls
in the managed care organization unless:
1. Authorized by the Department; or
2. The Program recipient initiates contact.
(16) (i) The Department shall be responsible for enrolling Program
recipients into managed care organizations.
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 865
(ii) The Department may contract with an entity to perform the
enrollment function.
(iii) The Department or its enrollment contractor shall administer a
health risk assessment developed by the Department to ensure that individuals who need
special or immediate health care services will receive the services on a timely basis.
(iv) The Department or its enrollment contractor:
1. May administer the health risk assessment only after the
Program recipient has chosen a managed care organization; and
2. Shall forward the results of the health risk assessment to
the managed care organization chosen by the Program recipient within 5 business days.
(17) For a managed care organization with which the Secretary contracts to
provide services to Program recipients under this subsection, the Secretary shall establish
a mechanism to initially assure that each historic provider that meets the Department’s
quality standards has the opportunity to continue to serve Program recipients as a
subcontractor of at least one managed care organization.
(18) (i) The Department shall make capitation payments to each
managed care organization as provided in this paragraph.
(ii) In consultation with the Insurance Commissioner, the Secretary
shall:
1. Set capitation payments at a level that is actuarially
adjusted to the benefits provided; and
2. Actuarially adjust the capitation payments to reflect the
relative risk assumed by the managed care organization.
(iii) In actuarially adjusting capitation payments under
subparagraph (ii)2 of this paragraph, the Secretary, in consultation with the Insurance
Commissioner, shall take into account, to the extent allowed under federal law, the
expenses incurred by the managed care organization applicable to the business of providing
care to enrolled individuals.
(19) (i) School–based clinics and managed care organizations shall
collaborate to provide continuity of care to enrollees.
(ii) School–based clinics shall be defined by the Department in
consultation with the State Department of Education.
– 15 –

Ch. 865 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iii) Each managed care organization shall require a school–based
clinic to provide to the managed care organization certain information, as specified by the
Department, about an encounter with an enrollee of the managed care organization prior
to paying the school–based clinic.
(iv) Upon receipt of information specified by the Department, the
managed care organization shall pay, at Medicaid–established rates, school–based clinics
for covered services provided to enrollees of the managed care organization.
(v) The Department shall work with managed care organizations
and school–based clinics to develop collaboration standards, guidelines, and a process to
assure that the services provided are covered and medically appropriate and that the
process provides for timely notification among the parties.
(vi) Each managed care organization shall maintain records of all
health care services:
1. Provided to its enrollees by school–based clinics; and
2. For which the managed care organization has been billed.
(20) The Department shall establish standards for the timely delivery of
services to enrollees.
(21) (i) The Department shall establish a delivery system for specialty
mental health services for enrollees of managed care organizations.
(ii) The Behavioral Health Administration shall:
1. Design and monitor the delivery system;
2. Establish performance standards for providers in the
delivery system; and
3. Establish procedures to ensure appropriate and timely
referrals from managed care organizations to the delivery system that include:
A. Specification of the diagnoses and conditions eligible for
referral to the delivery system;
B. Training and clinical guidance in appropriate use of the
delivery system for managed care organization primary care providers;
C. Preauthorization by the utilization review agent of the
delivery system; and
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 865
D. Penalties for a pattern of improper referrals.
(iii) The Department shall collaborate with managed care
organizations to develop standards and guidelines for the provision of specialty mental
health services.
(iv) The delivery system shall:
1. Provide all specialty mental health services needed by
enrollees;
2. For enrollees who are dually diagnosed, coordinate the
provision of substance use disorder services provided by the managed care organizations of
the enrollees;
3. Consist of a network of qualified mental health
professionals from all core disciplines;
4. Include linkages with other public service systems; and
5. Comply with quality assurance, enrollee input, data
collection, and other requirements specified by the Department in regulation.
(v) The Department may contract with a managed care organization
for delivery of specialty mental health services if the managed care organization meets the
performance standards adopted by the Department in regulations.
(vi) The provisions of § 15–1005 of the Insurance Article apply to the
delivery system for specialty mental health services established under this paragraph and
administered by an administrative services organization.
(vii) The Department and the Behavioral Health Administration
shall ensure that the delivery system has an adequate network of providers available to
provide substance use disorder treatment for children under the age of 18 years.
(22) The Department shall include a definition of medical necessity in its
quality and access standards.
(23) (i) The Department shall adopt regulations relating to enrollment,
disenrollment, and enrollee appeals.
(ii) Program recipients shall have the right to choose:
1. The managed care organization with which they are
enrolled; and
– 17 –

Ch. 865 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2. The primary care provider to whom they are assigned
within the managed care organization.
(iii) If a recipient is disenrolled and reenrolls within 120 days of the
recipient’s disenrollment, the Department shall:
1. Assign the recipient to the managed care organization in
which the recipient previously was enrolled; and
2. Require the managed care organization to assign the
recipient to the primary care provider of record at the time of the recipient’s disenrollment.
(iv) Whenever a recipient has to select a new managed care
organization because the recipient’s managed care organization has departed from the
HealthChoice Program, the departing managed care organization:
1. Shall provide a written notice to the recipient 60 days
before departing from the Program;
2. Shall include in the notice the name and provider number
of the primary care provider assigned to the recipient and the telephone number of the
enrollment broker; and
3. Within 30 days after departing from the Program, shall
provide the Department with a list of enrollees and the name of each enrollee’s primary
care provider.
(v) On receiving the list provided by the managed care organization,
the Department shall provide the list to:
1. The enrollment broker to assist and provide outreach to
recipients in selecting a managed care organization; and
2. The remaining managed care organizations for the
purpose of linking recipients with a primary care provider in accordance with federal law
and regulation.
(vi) Subject to subsection (f)(4) and (5) of this section, an enrollee may
disenroll from a managed care organization:
1. Without cause in the month following the anniversary
date of the enrollee’s enrollment; and
2. For cause, at any time as determined by the Secretary.
– 18 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 865
(24) The Department or its subcontractor, to the extent feasible in its
marketing or enrollment programs, shall hire individuals receiving assistance under the
program of Aid to Families with Dependent Children established under Title IV, Part A, of
the Social Security Act, or the successor to the program.
(25) The Department shall disenroll an enrollee who is a child in
State–supervised care if the child is transferred to an area outside of the territory of the
managed care organization.
(26) The Secretary shall adopt regulations to implement the provisions of
this section.
(27) (i) 1. The Department shall establish the Maryland Medicaid
Advisory Committee, composed of no more than 25 members.
2. The majority of the members of the Committee shall be
enrollees or enrollee advocates.
3. At least five members of the Committee shall be enrollees
representative of the entire Medicaid population.
(ii) The Committee members shall include:
1. At least five current or former enrollees or the parents or
guardians of current or former enrollees;
2. Providers who are familiar with the medical needs of
low–income population groups, including board–certified physicians;
3. Hospital representatives;
4. At least five but not more than 10 advocates for the
Medicaid population, including representatives of special needs populations, such as:
A. Children with special needs;
B. Individuals with physical disabilities;
C. Individuals with developmental disabilities;
D. Individuals with mental illness;
E. Individuals with brain injuries;
F. Medicaid and Medicare dual eligibles;
– 19 –

Ch. 865 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
G. Individuals who are homeless or have experienced
homelessness;
H. Individuals enrolled in home– and community–based
services waivers;
I. Elderly individuals;
J. Low–income individuals and individuals receiving
benefits through the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Program; and
K. Individuals receiving substance abuse treatment services;
5. Two members of the Finance Committee of the Senate of
Maryland, appointed by the President of the Senate; and
6. Three members of the Maryland House of Delegates,
appointed by the Speaker of the House.
(iii) A designee of each of the following shall serve as an ex–officio
member of the Committee:
1. The Secretary of Human Services;
2. The Executive Director of the Maryland Health Care
Commission; and
3. The Maryland Association of County Health Officers.
(iv) In addition to any duties imposed by federal law and regulation,
the Committee shall:
1. Advise the Secretary on the implementation, operation,
and evaluation of managed care programs under this section;
2. Review and make recommendations on the regulations
developed to implement managed care programs under this section;
3. Review and make recommendations on the standards used
in contracts between the Department and managed care organizations;
4. Review and make recommendations on the Department’s
oversight of quality assurance standards;
– 20 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 865
5. Review data collected by the Department from managed
care organizations participating in the Program and data collected by the Maryland Health
Care Commission;
6. Promote the dissemination of managed care organization
performance information, including loss ratios, to enrollees in a manner that facilitates
quality comparisons and uses layman’s language;
7. Assist the Department in evaluating the enrollment
process; and
8. Review reports of the ombudsmen.
(v) Except as specified in subparagraphs (ii) and (iii) of this
paragraph, the members of the Maryland Medicaid Advisory Committee shall be appointed
by the Secretary and serve for a 4–year term.
(vi) In making appointments to the Committee, the Secretary shall
provide for continuity and rotation.
(vii) In appointing consumer members to the Committee, the
Secretary shall seek recommendations from:
1. The State Protection and Advocacy System Organization;
2. The Statewide Independent Living Council;
3. The Developmental Disabilities Council;
4. The Department of Disabilities;
5. The Department of Aging;
6. Consumer advocacy organizations; and
7. The public.
(viii) The Secretary shall appoint the chair of the Committee.
(ix) The Secretary shall appoint nonvoting members from managed
care organizations who may participate in Committee meetings, unless the Committee
meets in closed session as provided in § 3–305 of the General Provisions Article.
(x) The Department shall provide staff for the Committee.
– 21 –

Ch. 865 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(xi) The Committee shall determine the times and places of its
meetings.
(xii) 1. The chair of the Committee and the staff for the
Committee shall provide the agenda, minutes, and any written materials to be presented
or discussed at a meeting to the members of the Committee at least 5 days prior to the
meeting.
2. The agenda, minutes, and written materials shall be
provided to members of the Committee in a manner and format that reasonably
accommodates the specific needs of the member.
(xiii) 1. Except as provided in subsubparagraph 2 of this
subparagraph, a member of the Committee:
A. May not receive compensation; but
B. Is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the
Standard State Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
2. A member of the Committee who is an enrollee is entitled
to reimbursement for:
A. Expenses for personal and dependent care incurred during
the meeting and during travel time to and from the meeting;
B. Expenses for cognitive supports related to the meeting;
and
C. Appropriate transportation to and from the meeting.
3. On request, the Department shall provide for a dedicated
Department staff person:
A. To review meeting materials with enrollee members in
advance of a meeting by telephone or in person; and
B. To provide referrals to advocacy organizations.]
[(28) (i)] (F) (1) The Department shall ensure that payments for
services provided by a hospital located in a contiguous state or in the District of Columbia
to an enrollee under the Program shall be reduced by 20% if the hospital fails to submit
discharge data on all Maryland patients receiving care in the hospital to the Health
Services Cost Review Commission in a form and manner the Commission specifies.
– 22 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 865
[(ii)] (2) [Subparagraph (i) of this paragraph] PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION does not apply to a hospital that presently provides discharge data to
the public in a form the Health Services Cost Review Commission determines is
satisfactory.
[(29) A managed care organization shall provide coverage for hearing loss
screenings of newborns provided by a hospital before discharge.
(30) (i) The Department shall provide enrollees and health care
providers with an accurate directory or other listing of all available providers:
1. In written form, made available upon request; and
2. On an Internet database.
(ii) The Department shall update the Internet database at least
every 30 days.
(iii) The written directory shall include a conspicuous reference to the
Internet database.
(31) Paragraph (9)(xvii) of this subsection may not be construed to require a
managed care organization to:
(i) Assist an enrollee in drafting an electronic advance care
planning document;
(ii) Store electronic advance care planning documents; or
(iii) Access advance care planning documents.
(32) A managed care organization may not apply a prior authorization
requirement for a prescription drug used as postexposure prophylaxis for the prevention of
HIV if the prescription drug is prescribed for use in accordance with Centers for Disease
Control and Prevention guidelines.
(33) The Secretary shall adopt regulations for pharmacy benefits managers
that contract with managed care organizations that establish requirements for conducting
audits of pharmacies or pharmacists that are:
(i) To the extent practicable, substantively similar to the audit
provisions under § 15–1629 of the Insurance Article; and
(ii) Consistent with federal law.]
– 23 –

Ch. 865 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(c)] (G) (1) (i) In this subsection the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(ii) “Certified nurse practitioner” means a registered nurse who is
licensed in this State, has completed a nurse practitioner program approved by the State
Board of Nursing, and has passed an examination approved by that Board.
(iii) “Nurse anesthetist” means a registered nurse who is:
1. Certified under the Health Occupations Article to practice
nurse anesthesia; and
2. Certified by the Council on Certification or the Council on
Recertification of Nurse Anesthetists.
(iv) “Nurse midwife” means a registered nurse who is licensed in this
State and has been certified by the American College of Nurse–Midwives as a nurse
midwife.
(v) “Optometrist” has the meaning stated in § 11–101 of the Health
Occupations Article.
(2) The Secretary may contract for the provision of care under the Program
to eligible Program recipients.
(3) The Secretary may contract with insurance companies or nonprofit
health service plans or with individuals, associations, partnerships, incorporated or
unincorporated groups of physicians, chiropractors, dentists, podiatrists, optometrists,
pharmacists, hospitals, nursing homes, nurses, including nurse anesthetists, nurse
midwives and certified nurse practitioners, opticians, and other health practitioners who
are licensed or certified in this State and perform services on the prescription or referral of
a physician.
(4) For the purposes of this section, the nurse midwife need not be under
the supervision of a physician.
(5) Except as otherwise provided by law, a contract that the Secretary
makes under this subsection shall continue unless terminated under the terms of the
contract by the Program or by the provider.
[(d)] (H) As permitted by federal law or waiver, the Secretary may administer
the Medicare Option Prescription Drug Program, established under § 15–124.3 of this
subtitle, as part of the Maryland Medical Assistance Program.
– 24 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 865
[(e)] (I) By regulation, the Department shall adopt a methodology to ensure
that federally qualified health centers are paid reasonable cost–based reimbursement that
is consistent with federal law.
[(f) (1) The Department shall establish mechanisms for:
(i) Identifying a Program recipient’s primary care provider at the
time of enrollment into a managed care program; and
(ii) Maintaining continuity of care with the primary care provider if:
1. The provider has a contract with a managed care
organization or a contracted medical group of a managed care organization to provide
primary care services; and
2. The recipient desires to continue care with the provider.
(2) If a Program recipient enrolls in a managed care organization and
requests assignment to a particular primary care provider who has a contract with the
managed care organization or a contracted group of the managed care organization, the
managed care organization shall assign the recipient to the primary care provider.
(3) A Program recipient may request a change of primary care providers
within the same managed care organization at any time and, if the primary care provider
has a contract with the managed care organization or a contracted group of the managed
care organization, the managed care organization shall honor the request.
(4) In accordance with the federal Health Care Financing Administration’s
guidelines, a Program recipient may elect to disenroll from a managed care organization if
the managed care organization terminates its contract with the Department.
(5) A Program recipient may disenroll from a managed care organization
to maintain continuity of care with a primary care provider if:
(i) The contract between the primary care provider and the
managed care organization or contracted group of the managed care organization
terminates because:
1. The managed care organization or contracted group of the
managed care organization terminates the provider’s contract for a reason other than
quality of care or the provider’s failure to comply with contractual requirements related to
quality assurance activities;
2. A. The managed care organization or contracted group
of the managed care organization reduces the primary care provider’s capitated or
applicable fee for services rates;
– 25 –

Ch. 865 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
B. The reduction in rates is greater than the actual change in
rates or capitation paid to the managed care organization by the Department; and
C. The provider and the managed care organization or
contracted group of the managed care organization are unable to negotiate a mutually
acceptable rate; or
3. The provider contract between the provider and the
managed care organization is terminated because the managed care organization is
acquired by another entity; and
(ii) 1. The Program recipient desires to continue to receive care
from the primary care provider;
2. The provider contracts with at least one other managed
care organization or contracted group of a managed care organization; and
3. The enrollee notifies the Department or the Department’s
designee of the enrollee’s intention within 90 days after the contract termination.
(6) The Department shall provide timely notification to the affected
managed care organization of an enrollee’s intention to disenroll under the provisions of
paragraph (5) of this subsection.]
15–103.1.
(A) AS PERMITTED BY FEDERAL LAW OR WAIVER, THE SECRETARY MAY
ESTABLISH A PROGRAM UNDER WHICH PROGRAM RECIPIENTS ARE REQUIRED TO
ENROLL IN MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATIONS.
(B) (1) THE BENEFITS REQUIRED BY THE PROGRAM DEVELOPED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL BE:
(I) ADOPTED BY REGULATION; AND
(II) AT LEAST EQUIVALENT TO THE BENEFIT LEVEL REQUIRED
BY THE PROGRAM ON JANUARY 1, 1996.
(2) SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS OF THE STATE BUDGET AND AS
PERMITTED BY FEDERAL LAW OR WAIVER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE
REIMBURSEMENT FOR MEDICALLY NECESSARY AND APPROPRIATE INPATIENT,
INTERMEDIATE CARE, AND HALFWAY HOUSE SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER
TREATMENT SERVICES FOR ENROLLEES AT LEAST 21 YEARS OLD WITH SUBSTANCE
– 26 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 865
USE DISORDERS WHO ARE RECIPIENTS OF TEMPORARY CASH ASSISTANCE UNDER
THE FAMILY INVESTMENT PROGRAM.
(3) EACH MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION PARTICIPATING IN THE
PROGRAM DEVELOPED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL PROVIDE
OR ARRANGE FOR THE PROVISION OF THE BENEFITS DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (2)
OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(4) THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT A
MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION FROM OFFERING ADDITIONAL BENEFITS IF THE
MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION IS NOT RECEIVING CAPITATION PAYMENTS BASED
ON THE PROVISION OF THE ADDITIONAL BENEFITS.
(5) NOTWITHSTANDING PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
BENEFITS REQUIRED BY THE PROGRAM DEVELOPED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF
THIS SECTION SHALL INCLUDE DENTAL SERVICES FOR PREGNANT WOMEN.
(C) SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS OF THE STATE BUDGET AND AS
PERMITTED BY FEDERAL LAW OR WAIVER, THE PROGRAM DEVELOPED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION MAY PROVIDE GUARANTEED ELIGIBILITY FOR
EACH ENROLLEE FOR UP TO 6 MONTHS UNLESS AN ENROLLEE OBTAINS HEALTH
INSURANCE THROUGH ANOTHER SOURCE.
(D) (1) THE SECRETARY MAY EXCLUDE SPECIFIC POPULATIONS OR
SERVICES FROM THE PROGRAM DEVELOPED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION.
(2) FOR ANY POPULATIONS OR SERVICES EXCLUDED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION, THE SECRETARY MAY AUTHORIZE A MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION
TO PROVIDE THE SERVICES OR PROVIDE FOR THE POPULATION, INCLUDING
AUTHORIZATION OF A SEPARATE DENTAL MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION OR A
MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION TO PROVIDE SERVICES TO PROGRAM RECIPIENTS
WITH SPECIAL NEEDS.
(E) (1) EXCEPT FOR A SERVICE EXCLUDED BY THE SECRETARY UNDER
SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, EACH MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION SHALL
PROVIDE ALL THE BENEFITS REQUIRED BY REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) FOR A POPULATION OR SERVICE EXCLUDED BY THE SECRETARY
UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, THE SECRETARY MAY AUTHORIZE A
MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION TO PROVIDE ONLY FOR THAT POPULATION OR
PROVIDE ONLY THAT SERVICE.
– 27 –

Ch. 865 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) A MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION MAY SUBCONTRACT SPECIFIED
REQUIRED SERVICES TO A HEALTH CARE PROVIDER THAT IS LICENSED OR
AUTHORIZED TO PROVIDE THOSE SERVICES.
(F) EXCEPT FOR THE PROGRAM OF ALL–INCLUSIVE CARE FOR THE
ELDERLY (“PACE”) PROGRAM, THE SECRETARY MAY NOT INCLUDE THE
LONG–TERM CARE POPULATION OR LONG–TERM CARE SERVICES IN THE PROGRAM
DEVELOPED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
(G) THE PROGRAM DEVELOPED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION
SHALL ENSURE THAT ENROLLEES HAVE ACCESS TO A PHARMACY THAT:
(1) IS LICENSED IN THE STATE; AND
(2) IS WITHIN A REASONABLE DISTANCE FROM THE ENROLLEE’S
RESIDENCE.
(H) FOR CAUSE, THE DEPARTMENT MAY DISENROLL ENROLLEES FROM A
MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION AND ENROLL THEM IN ANOTHER MANAGED CARE
ORGANIZATION.
(I) (1) EACH MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION SHALL:
(I) HAVE A QUALITY ASSURANCE PROGRAM IN EFFECT THAT IS
SUBJECT TO THE APPROVAL OF THE DEPARTMENT AND THAT, AT A MINIMUM:
1. COMPLIES WITH ANY HEALTH CARE QUALITY
IMPROVEMENT SYSTEM DEVELOPED BY THE CENTERS FOR MEDICARE AND
MEDICAID SERVICES;
2. COMPLIES WITH THE QUALITY REQUIREMENTS OF
APPLICABLE STATE LICENSURE LAWS AND REGULATIONS;
3. COMPLIES WITH PRACTICE GUIDELINES AND
PROTOCOLS SPECIFIED BY THE DEPARTMENT;
4. PROVIDES FOR AN ENROLLEE GRIEVANCE SYSTEM,
INCLUDING AN ENROLLEE HOTLINE;
5. PROVIDES FOR A PROVIDER GRIEVANCE SYSTEM;
– 28 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 865
6. PROVIDES FOR ENROLLEE AND PROVIDER
SATISFACTION SURVEYS, TO BE TAKEN AT LEAST ANNUALLY;
7. PROVIDES FOR A CONSUMER ADVISORY BOARD TO
RECEIVE REGULAR INPUT FROM ENROLLEES;
8. PROVIDES FOR AN ANNUAL CONSUMER ADVISORY
BOARD REPORT TO BE SUBMITTED TO THE SECRETARY; AND
9. COMPLIES WITH SPECIFIC QUALITY, ACCESS, DATA,
AND PERFORMANCE MEASUREMENTS ADOPTED BY THE DEPARTMENT FOR
TREATING ENROLLEES WITH SPECIAL NEEDS;
(II) SUBMIT TO THE DEPARTMENT:
1. SERVICE–SPECIFIC DATA BY SERVICE TYPE IN A
FORMAT ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT;
2. UTILIZATION AND OUTCOME REPORTS, SUCH AS THE
HEALTH PLAN EMPLOYER DATA AND INFORMATION SET (HEDIS), AS DIRECTED
BY THE DEPARTMENT; AND
3. AT LEAST SEMIANNUALLY, AGGREGATE DATA THAT
INCLUDES:
A. THE NUMBER OF ENROLLEES PROVIDED WITH
SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER TREATMENT SERVICES; AND
B. THE AMOUNT OF MONEY SPENT ON SUBSTANCE USE
DISORDER TREATMENT;
(III) PROMOTE TIMELY ACCESS TO AND CONTINUITY OF HEALTH
CARE SERVICES FOR ENROLLEES;
(IV) DEMONSTRATE ORGANIZATIONAL CAPACITY TO PROVIDE
SPECIAL PROGRAMS, INCLUDING OUTREACH, CASE MANAGEMENT, AND HOME
VISITING, TAILORED TO MEET THE INDIVIDUAL NEEDS OF ALL ENROLLEES;
(V) PROVIDE ASSISTANCE TO ENROLLEES IN SECURING
NECESSARY HEALTH CARE SERVICES;
(VI) PROVIDE OR ENSURE SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER
TREATMENT FOR PREGNANT WOMEN WITH SUBSTANCE USE DISORDERS AND ALL
– 29 –

Ch. 865 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
OTHER ENROLLEES OF THE MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION WHO REQUIRE THESE
SERVICES;
(VII) EDUCATE ENROLLEES ON HEALTH CARE PREVENTION AND
GOOD HEALTH HABITS;
(VIII) ENSURE NECESSARY PROVIDER CAPACITY IN ALL
GEOGRAPHIC AREAS UNDER CONTRACT;
(IX) BE ACCOUNTABLE AND HOLD ITS SUBCONTRACTORS
ACCOUNTABLE FOR STANDARDS ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT AND, ON
FAILURE TO MEET THOSE STANDARDS, BE SUBJECT TO ONE OR MORE OF THE
FOLLOWING PENALTIES:
1. FINES;
2. SUSPENSION OF FURTHER ENROLLMENTS;
3. WITHHOLDING OF ALL OR PART OF THE CAPITATION
PAYMENT;
4. TERMINATION OF THE CONTRACT;
5. DISQUALIFICATION FROM FUTURE PARTICIPATION IN
THE PROGRAM; AND
6. ANY OTHER PENALTIES THAT MAY BE IMPOSED BY
THE DEPARTMENT;
(X) SUBJECT TO APPLICABLE FEDERAL AND STATE LAW,
INCLUDE INCENTIVES FOR ENROLLEES TO COMPLY WITH PROVISIONS OF THE
MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION;
(XI) PROVIDE OR ARRANGE TO PROVIDE PRIMARY MENTAL
HEALTH SERVICES;
(XII) PROVIDE OR ARRANGE TO PROVIDE ALL
MEDICAID–COVERED SERVICES REQUIRED TO COMPLY WITH STATE STATUTES AND
REGULATIONS MANDATING HEALTH AND MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES FOR CHILDREN
IN STATE–SUPERVISED CARE:
– 30 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 865
1. ACCORDING TO STANDARDS SET BY THE
DEPARTMENT; AND
2. LOCALLY, TO THE EXTENT THE SERVICES ARE
AVAILABLE LOCALLY;
(XIII) SUBMIT TO THE DEPARTMENT AGGREGATE INFORMATION
FROM THE QUALITY ASSURANCE PROGRAM, INCLUDING COMPLAINTS AND
RESOLUTIONS FROM THE ENROLLEE AND PROVIDER GRIEVANCE SYSTEMS, THE
ENROLLEE HOTLINE, AND ENROLLEE SATISFACTION SURVEYS;
(XIV) MAINTAIN AS PART OF THE ENROLLEE’S MEDICAL RECORD
THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION:
1. THE BASIC HEALTH RISK ASSESSMENT CONDUCTED
ON ENROLLMENT;
2. ANY INFORMATION THE MANAGED CARE
ORGANIZATION RECEIVES THAT RESULTS FROM AN ASSESSMENT OF THE ENROLLEE
CONDUCTED FOR THE PURPOSE OF ANY EARLY INTERVENTION, EVALUATION,
PLANNING, OR CASE MANAGEMENT PROGRAM;
3. INFORMATION FROM THE LOCAL DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL SERVICES REGARDING ANY OTHER SERVICE OR BENEFIT THE ENROLLEE
RECEIVES, INCLUDING ASSISTANCE OR BENEFITS FROM A PROGRAM ADMINISTERED
BY THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES UNDER THE HUMAN SERVICES
ARTICLE; AND
4. ANY INFORMATION THE MANAGED CARE
ORGANIZATION RECEIVES FROM A SCHOOL–BASED CLINIC, A CORE SERVICES
AGENCY, A LOCAL HEALTH DEPARTMENT, OR ANY OTHER PERSON THAT HAS
PROVIDED HEALTH SERVICES TO THE ENROLLEE;
(XV) ON PROVISION OF INFORMATION SPECIFIED BY THE
DEPARTMENT UNDER SUBSECTION (R)(3) OF THIS SECTION, PAY SCHOOL–BASED
CLINICS FOR SERVICES PROVIDED TO THE MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION’S
ENROLLEES;
(XVI) IN COORDINATION WITH PARTICIPATING DENTISTS,
ENROLLEES, AND FAMILIES OF ENROLLEES, DEVELOP A PROCESS TO ARRANGE TO
PROVIDE DENTAL THERAPEUTIC TREATMENT TO INDIVIDUALS UNDER THE AGE OF
21 YEARS THAT REQUIRES:
– 31 –

Ch. 865 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
1. A PARTICIPATING DENTIST TO NOTIFY A MANAGED
CARE ORGANIZATION WHEN AN ENROLLEE IS IN NEED OF THERAPEUTIC
TREATMENT AND THE DENTIST IS UNABLE TO PROVIDE THE TREATMENT;
2. THE MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION TO PROVIDE
THE ENROLLEE OR THE FAMILY OF THE ENROLLEE WITH A LIST OF PARTICIPATING
PROVIDERS WHO OFFER THERAPEUTIC DENTAL SERVICES; AND
3. THE MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION TO NOTIFY THE
ENROLLEE OR THE FAMILY OF THE ENROLLEE THAT THE MANAGED CARE
ORGANIZATION WILL PROVIDE FURTHER ASSISTANCE IF THE ENROLLEE HAS
DIFFICULTY OBTAINING AN APPOINTMENT WITH A PROVIDER OF THERAPEUTIC
DENTAL SERVICES;
(XVII) PROVIDE THE ADVANCE DIRECTIVE INFORMATION SHEET
DEVELOPED UNDER § 5–615 OF THIS ARTICLE:
1. TO ALL ENROLLEES AT THE TIME OF INITIAL
ENROLLMENT AND IN THE MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION’S ENROLLEE
PUBLICATIONS;
2. IF THE MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION MAINTAINS A
WEBSITE, ON THE MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION’S WEBSITE; AND
3. AT THE REQUEST OF AN ENROLLEE; AND
(XVIII) IF THE MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION MAINTAINS A
WEBSITE, PROVIDE A LINK TO THE WEBPAGE THAT IS ACCESSED THROUGH THE TAB
ON THE STATE–DESIGNATED HEALTH INFORMATION EXCHANGE WEBSITE
REQUIRED UNDER § 19–145.1(B)(2)(IV) OF THIS ARTICLE.
(2) PARAGRAPH (1)(XVII) OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE
CONSTRUED TO REQUIRE A MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION TO:
(I) ASSIST AN ENROLLEE IN DRAFTING AN ELECTRONIC
ADVANCE CARE PLANNING DOCUMENT;
(II) STORE ELECTRONIC ADVANCE CARE PLANNING
DOCUMENTS; OR
(III) ACCESS ADVANCE CARE PLANNING DOCUMENTS.
– 32 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 865
(3) (I) EACH MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION SHALL NOTIFY EACH
ENROLLEE WHEN THE ENROLLEE SHOULD OBTAIN AN IMMUNIZATION,
EXAMINATION, OR OTHER WELLNESS SERVICE.
(II) EACH MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION SHALL:
1. MAINTAIN EVIDENCE OF COMPLIANCE WITH
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
2. ON INITIAL APPLICATION TO PROVIDE HEALTH CARE
SERVICES TO ENROLLEES AND ON AN ANNUAL BASIS THEREAFTER, PROVIDE TO THE
DEPARTMENT EVIDENCE OF COMPLIANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION INCLUDING SUBMISSION OF A WRITTEN PLAN.
(III) A MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION THAT DOES NOT COMPLY
WITH PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION FOR AT LEAST 90% OF ITS NEW
ENROLLEES:
1. WITHIN 90 DAYS OF THEIR ENROLLMENT MAY NOT
RECEIVE MORE THAN 80% OF ITS CAPITATION PAYMENTS;
2. WITHIN 180 DAYS OF THEIR ENROLLMENT MAY NOT
RECEIVE MORE THAN 70% OF ITS CAPITATION PAYMENTS; AND
3. WITHIN 270 DAYS OF THEIR ENROLLMENT MAY NOT
RECEIVE MORE THAN 50% OF ITS CAPITATION PAYMENTS.
(IV) IF A MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION DOES NOT COMPLY
WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
DEPARTMENT MAY CONTRACT WITH ANY COMMUNITY–BASED HEALTH
ORGANIZATION THAT THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES IS WILLING AND ABLE TO
PERFORM COMPREHENSIVE OUTREACH SERVICES TO ENROLLEES.
(V) IN ADDITION TO THE PROVISIONS OF SUBPARAGRAPH (IV)
OF THIS PARAGRAPH, IF A MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION DOES NOT COMPLY WITH
THE REQUIREMENTS OF PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION OR FAILS TO PROVIDE
EVIDENCE OF COMPLIANCE TO THE DEPARTMENT UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH, THE DEPARTMENT MAY:
1. IMPOSE A FINE ON THE MANAGED CARE
ORGANIZATION;
– 33 –

Ch. 865 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2. SUSPEND FURTHER ENROLLMENT INTO THE
MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION;
3. WITHHOLD ALL OR PART OF THE CAPITATION RATE
FROM THE MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION;
4. TERMINATE THE PROVIDER AGREEMENT; OR
5. DISQUALIFY THE MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION
FROM FUTURE PARTICIPATION IN THE PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION
(A) OF THIS SECTION.
(VI) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEPOSIT FINES IMPOSED UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (V)1 OF THIS PARAGRAPH IN THE HEALTHCHOICE PERFORMANCE
INCENTIVE FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 15–103.5 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(J) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT ENSURE THAT
MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATIONS EMPLOY APPROPRIATE PERSONNEL TO:
(1) ENSURE THAT INDIVIDUALS WITH SPECIAL NEEDS OBTAIN
NEEDED SERVICES; AND
(2) COORDINATE THOSE SERVICES.
(K) (1) A MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION SHALL REIMBURSE A HOSPITAL
EMERGENCY FACILITY AND PROVIDER FOR:
(I) HEALTH CARE SERVICES THAT MEET THE DEFINITION OF
EMERGENCY SERVICES IN § 19–701 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(II) MEDICAL SCREENING SERVICES RENDERED TO MEET THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THE FEDERAL EMERGENCY MEDICAL TREATMENT AND ACTIVE
LABOR ACT;
(III) MEDICALLY NECESSARY SERVICES IF THE MANAGED CARE
ORGANIZATION AUTHORIZED, REFERRED, OR OTHERWISE ALLOWED THE ENROLLEE
TO USE THE EMERGENCY FACILITY AND THE MEDICALLY NECESSARY SERVICES ARE
RELATED TO THE CONDITION FOR WHICH THE ENROLLEE WAS ALLOWED TO USE THE
EMERGENCY FACILITY; AND
(IV) MEDICALLY NECESSARY SERVICES THAT RELATE TO THE
CONDITION PRESENTED AND THAT ARE PROVIDED BY THE PROVIDER IN THE
– 34 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 865
EMERGENCY FACILITY TO THE ENROLLEE IF THE MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION
FAILS TO PROVIDE 24–HOUR ACCESS TO A PHYSICIAN AS REQUIRED BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
(2) A PROVIDER MAY NOT BE REQUIRED TO OBTAIN PRIOR
AUTHORIZATION OR APPROVAL FOR PAYMENT FROM A MANAGED CARE
ORGANIZATION IN ORDER TO OBTAIN REIMBURSEMENT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(L) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) ESTABLISH AND MAINTAIN AN OMBUDSMAN PROGRAM AND A
LOCALLY ACCESSIBLE ENROLLEE HOTLINE;
(2) PERFORM FOCUSED MEDICAL REVIEWS OF MANAGED CARE
ORGANIZATIONS THAT INCLUDE REVIEWS OF HOW THE MANAGED CARE
ORGANIZATIONS ARE PROVIDING HEALTH CARE SERVICES TO SPECIAL
POPULATIONS;
(3) PROVIDE TIMELY FEEDBACK TO EACH MANAGED CARE
ORGANIZATION ON ITS COMPLIANCE WITH THE DEPARTMENT’S QUALITY AND
ACCESS SYSTEM;
(4) ESTABLISH AND MAINTAIN WITHIN THE DEPARTMENT A PROCESS
FOR HANDLING PROVIDER COMPLAINTS ABOUT MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATIONS;
AND
(5) ADOPT REGULATIONS RELATING TO APPEALS BY MANAGED CARE
ORGANIZATIONS OF PENALTIES IMPOSED BY THE DEPARTMENT, INCLUDING
REGULATIONS PROVIDING FOR AN APPEAL TO THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE
HEARINGS.
(M) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL DELEGATE RESPONSIBILITY FOR MAINTAINING THE
OMBUDSMAN PROGRAM FOR A COUNTY TO THAT COUNTY’S LOCAL HEALTH
DEPARTMENT ON THE REQUEST OF THE LOCAL HEALTH DEPARTMENT.
(2) A LOCAL HEALTH DEPARTMENT MAY NOT SUBCONTRACT THE
OMBUDSMAN PROGRAM.
(3) BEFORE THE DEPARTMENT DELEGATES RESPONSIBILITY TO A
LOCAL HEALTH DEPARTMENT TO MAINTAIN THE OMBUDSMAN PROGRAM FOR A
COUNTY, A LOCAL HEALTH DEPARTMENT THAT IS ALSO A MEDICAID PROVIDER
– 35 –

Ch. 865 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
MUST RECEIVE THE APPROVAL OF THE SECRETARY AND THE LOCAL GOVERNING
BODY.
(N) A MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION MAY NOT:
(1) WITHOUT AUTHORIZATION BY THE DEPARTMENT, ENROLL AN
INDIVIDUAL WHO AT THE TIME IS A PROGRAM RECIPIENT; OR
(2) HAVE FACE–TO–FACE OR TELEPHONE CONTACT WITH, OR
OTHERWISE SOLICIT, AN INDIVIDUAL WHO AT THE TIME IS A PROGRAM RECIPIENT
BEFORE THE PROGRAM RECIPIENT ENROLLS IN THE MANAGED CARE
ORGANIZATION UNLESS:
(I) AUTHORIZED BY THE DEPARTMENT; OR
(II) THE PROGRAM RECIPIENT INITIATES CONTACT.
(O) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL BE RESPONSIBLE FOR ENROLLING
PROGRAM RECIPIENTS INTO MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATIONS.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT MAY CONTRACT WITH AN ENTITY TO PERFORM
THE ENROLLMENT FUNCTION.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT OR ITS ENROLLMENT CONTRACTOR SHALL
ADMINISTER A HEALTH RISK ASSESSMENT DEVELOPED BY THE DEPARTMENT TO
ENSURE THAT INDIVIDUALS WHO NEED SPECIAL OR IMMEDIATE HEALTH CARE
SERVICES WILL RECEIVE THE SERVICES ON A TIMELY BASIS.
(4) THE DEPARTMENT OR ITS ENROLLMENT CONTRACTOR:
(I) MAY ADMINISTER THE HEALTH RISK ASSESSMENT ONLY
AFTER THE PROGRAM RECIPIENT HAS CHOSEN A MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION;
AND
(II) SHALL FORWARD THE RESULTS OF THE HEALTH RISK
ASSESSMENT TO THE MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION CHOSEN BY THE PROGRAM
RECIPIENT WITHIN 5 BUSINESS DAYS.
(P) FOR A MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION WITH WHICH THE SECRETARY
CONTRACTS TO PROVIDE SERVICES TO PROGRAM RECIPIENTS UNDER THIS
SECTION, THE SECRETARY SHALL ESTABLISH A MECHANISM TO INITIALLY ENSURE
THAT EACH HISTORIC PROVIDER THAT MEETS THE DEPARTMENT’S QUALITY
– 36 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 865
STANDARDS HAS THE OPPORTUNITY TO CONTINUE TO SERVE PROGRAM RECIPIENTS
AS A SUBCONTRACTOR OF AT LEAST ONE MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION.
(Q) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL MAKE CAPITATION PAYMENTS TO EACH
MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION AS PROVIDED IN THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) IN CONSULTATION WITH THE INSURANCE COMMISSIONER, THE
SECRETARY SHALL:
(I) SET CAPITATION PAYMENTS AT A LEVEL THAT IS
ACTUARIALLY ADJUSTED TO THE BENEFITS PROVIDED; AND
(II) ACTUARIALLY ADJUST THE CAPITATION PAYMENTS TO
REFLECT THE RELATIVE RISK ASSUMED BY THE MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION.
(3) IN ACTUARIALLY ADJUSTING CAPITATION PAYMENTS UNDER
PARAGRAPH (2)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE SECRETARY, IN CONSULTATION WITH
THE INSURANCE COMMISSIONER, SHALL TAKE INTO ACCOUNT, TO THE EXTENT
ALLOWED UNDER FEDERAL LAW, THE EXPENSES INCURRED BY THE MANAGED CARE
ORGANIZATION APPLICABLE TO THE BUSINESS OF PROVIDING CARE TO ENROLLED
INDIVIDUALS.
(R) (1) SCHOOL–BASED CLINICS AND MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATIONS
SHALL COLLABORATE TO PROVIDE CONTINUITY OF CARE TO ENROLLEES.
(2) SCHOOL–BASED CLINICS SHALL BE DEFINED BY THE
DEPARTMENT IN CONSULTATION WITH THE STATE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION.
(3) EACH MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION SHALL REQUIRE A
SCHOOL–BASED CLINIC TO PROVIDE TO THE MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION
INFORMATION, AS SPECIFIED BY THE DEPARTMENT, ABOUT AN ENCOUNTER WITH
AN ENROLLEE OF THE MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION BEFORE PAYING THE
SCHOOL–BASED CLINIC.
(4) ON RECEIPT OF INFORMATION SPECIFIED BY THE DEPARTMENT,
THE MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION SHALL PAY, AT MEDICAID–ESTABLISHED
RATES, SCHOOL–BASED CLINICS FOR COVERED SERVICES PROVIDED TO ENROLLEES
OF THE MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION.
(5) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL WORK WITH MANAGED CARE
ORGANIZATIONS AND SCHOOL–BASED CLINICS TO DEVELOP COLLABORATION
STANDARDS, GUIDELINES, AND A PROCESS TO ENSURE THAT THE SERVICES
– 37 –

Ch. 865 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
PROVIDED ARE COVERED AND MEDICALLY APPROPRIATE AND THAT THE PROCESS
PROVIDES FOR TIMELY NOTIFICATION AMONG THE PARTIES.
(6) EACH MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION SHALL MAINTAIN RECORDS
OF ALL HEALTH CARE SERVICES:
(I) PROVIDED TO ITS ENROLLEES BY SCHOOL–BASED CLINICS;
AND
(II) FOR WHICH THE MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION HAS BEEN
BILLED.
(S) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH STANDARDS FOR THE TIMELY
DELIVERY OF SERVICES TO ENROLLEES.
(T) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH A DELIVERY SYSTEM FOR
SPECIALTY MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES FOR ENROLLEES OF MANAGED CARE
ORGANIZATIONS.
(2) THE BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ADMINISTRATION SHALL:
(I) DESIGN AND MONITOR THE DELIVERY SYSTEM;
(II) ESTABLISH PERFORMANCE STANDARDS FOR PROVIDERS IN
THE DELIVERY SYSTEM; AND
(III) ESTABLISH PROCEDURES TO ENSURE APPROPRIATE AND
TIMELY REFERRALS FROM MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATIONS TO THE DELIVERY
SYSTEM THAT INCLUDE:
1. SPECIFICATION OF THE DIAGNOSES AND CONDITIONS
ELIGIBLE FOR REFERRAL TO THE DELIVERY SYSTEM;
2. TRAINING AND CLINICAL GUIDANCE IN APPROPRIATE
USE OF THE DELIVERY SYSTEM FOR MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION PRIMARY CARE
PROVIDERS;
3. PREAUTHORIZATION BY THE UTILIZATION REVIEW
AGENT OF THE DELIVERY SYSTEM; AND
4. PENALTIES FOR A PATTERN OF IMPROPER
REFERRALS.
– 38 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 865
(3) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL COLLABORATE WITH MANAGED CARE
ORGANIZATIONS TO DEVELOP STANDARDS AND GUIDELINES FOR THE PROVISION OF
SPECIALTY MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES.
(4) THE DELIVERY SYSTEM SHALL:
(I) PROVIDE ALL SPECIALTY MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES
NEEDED BY ENROLLEES;
(II) FOR ENROLLEES WHO ARE DUALLY DIAGNOSED,
COORDINATE THE PROVISION OF SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER TREATMENT SERVICES
PROVIDED BY THE MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATIONS OF THE ENROLLEES;
(III) CONSIST OF A NETWORK OF QUALIFIED MENTAL HEALTH
PROFESSIONALS FROM ALL CORE DISCIPLINES;
(IV) INCLUDE LINKAGES WITH OTHER PUBLIC SERVICE
SYSTEMS; AND
(V) COMPLY WITH QUALITY ASSURANCE, ENROLLEE INPUT,
DATA COLLECTION, AND OTHER REQUIREMENTS SPECIFIED BY THE DEPARTMENT
IN REGULATION.
(5) THE DEPARTMENT MAY CONTRACT WITH A MANAGED CARE
ORGANIZATION FOR DELIVERY OF SPECIALTY MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES IF THE
MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION MEETS THE PERFORMANCE STANDARDS ADOPTED
BY THE DEPARTMENT IN REGULATIONS.
(6) THE PROVISIONS OF § 15–1005 OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE
APPLY TO THE DELIVERY SYSTEM FOR SPECIALTY MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES
ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION AND ADMINISTERED BY AN
ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES ORGANIZATION.
(7) THE DEPARTMENT AND THE BEHAVIORAL HEALTH
ADMINISTRATION SHALL ENSURE THAT THE DELIVERY SYSTEM HAS AN ADEQUATE
NETWORK OF PROVIDERS AVAILABLE TO PROVIDE SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER
TREATMENT FOR CHILDREN UNDER THE AGE OF 18 YEARS.
(U) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL INCLUDE A DEFINITION OF MEDICAL
NECESSITY IN ITS QUALITY AND ACCESS STANDARDS.
– 39 –

Ch. 865 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(V) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS RELATING TO
ENROLLMENT, DISENROLLMENT, AND ENROLLEE APPEALS.
(2) PROGRAM RECIPIENTS SHALL HAVE THE RIGHT TO CHOOSE:
(I) THE MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION WITH WHICH THEY
ARE ENROLLED; AND
(II) THE PRIMARY CARE PROVIDER TO WHOM THEY ARE
ASSIGNED WITHIN THE MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION.
(3) IF A RECIPIENT IS DISENROLLED AND REENROLLS WITHIN 120
DAYS AFTER THE RECIPIENT’S DISENROLLMENT, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(I) ASSIGN THE RECIPIENT TO THE MANAGED CARE
ORGANIZATION IN WHICH THE RECIPIENT PREVIOUSLY WAS ENROLLED; AND
(II) REQUIRE THE MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION TO ASSIGN
THE RECIPIENT TO THE PRIMARY CARE PROVIDER OF RECORD AT THE TIME OF THE
RECIPIENT’S DISENROLLMENT.
(4) WHENEVER A RECIPIENT HAS TO SELECT A NEW MANAGED CARE
ORGANIZATION BECAUSE THE RECIPIENT’S MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION HAS
DEPARTED FROM THE PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION, THE DEPARTING MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION:
(I) SHALL PROVIDE A WRITTEN NOTICE TO THE RECIPIENT 60
DAYS BEFORE DEPARTING FROM THE PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION
(A) OF THIS SECTION;
(II) SHALL INCLUDE IN THE NOTICE THE NAME AND PROVIDER
NUMBER OF THE PRIMARY CARE PROVIDER ASSIGNED TO THE RECIPIENT AND THE
TELEPHONE NUMBER OF THE ENROLLMENT BROKER; AND
(III) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER DEPARTING FROM THE PROGRAM,
SHALL PROVIDE THE DEPARTMENT WITH A LIST OF ENROLLEES AND THE NAME OF
EACH ENROLLEE’S PRIMARY CARE PROVIDER.
(5) ON RECEIVING THE LIST PROVIDED BY THE MANAGED CARE
ORGANIZATION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE THE LIST TO:
– 40 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 865
(I) THE ENROLLMENT BROKER TO ASSIST AND PROVIDE
OUTREACH TO RECIPIENTS IN SELECTING A MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION; AND
(II) THE REMAINING MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATIONS FOR THE
PURPOSE OF LINKING RECIPIENTS WITH A PRIMARY CARE PROVIDER IN
ACCORDANCE WITH FEDERAL LAW AND REGULATION.
(6) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (DD)(4) AND (5) OF THIS SECTION, AN
ENROLLEE MAY DISENROLL FROM A MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION:
(I) WITHOUT CAUSE IN THE MONTH FOLLOWING THE
ANNIVERSARY DATE OF THE ENROLLEE’S ENROLLMENT; AND
(II) FOR CAUSE, AT ANY TIME AS DETERMINED BY THE
SECRETARY.
(W) THE DEPARTMENT OR ITS SUBCONTRACTOR, TO THE EXTENT FEASIBLE
IN ITS MARKETING OR ENROLLMENT PROGRAMS, SHALL HIRE INDIVIDUALS
RECEIVING ASSISTANCE UNDER THE PROGRAM OF AID TO FAMILIES WITH
DEPENDENT CHILDREN ESTABLISHED UNDER TITLE IV, PART A OF THE SOCIAL
SECURITY ACT, OR THE SUCCESSOR TO THE PROGRAM.
(X) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DISENROLL AN ENROLLEE WHO IS A CHILD IN
STATE–SUPERVISED CARE IF THE CHILD IS TRANSFERRED TO AN AREA OUTSIDE THE
TERRITORY OF THE MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION.
(Y) THE SECRETARY SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION.
(Z) A MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION SHALL PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR
HEARING LOSS SCREENINGS OF NEWBORNS PROVIDED BY A HOSPITAL BEFORE
DISCHARGE.
(AA) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE ENROLLEES AND HEALTH
CARE PROVIDERS WITH AN ACCURATE DIRECTORY OR OTHER LISTING OF ALL
AVAILABLE PROVIDERS:
(I) IN WRITTEN FORM, MADE AVAILABLE ON REQUEST; AND
(II) ON AN INTERNET DATABASE.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL UPDATE THE INTERNET DATABASE AT
LEAST EVERY 30 DAYS.
– 41 –

Ch. 865 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) THE WRITTEN DIRECTORY SHALL INCLUDE A CONSPICUOUS
REFERENCE TO THE INTERNET DATABASE.
(BB) A MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION MAY NOT APPLY A PRIOR
AUTHORIZATION REQUIREMENT FOR A PRESCRIPTION DRUG USED AS
POSTEXPOSURE PROPHYLAXIS FOR THE PREVENTION OF HIV IF THE PRESCRIPTION
DRUG IS PRESCRIBED FOR USE IN ACCORDANCE WITH CENTERS FOR DISEASE
CONTROL AND PREVENTION GUIDELINES.
(CC) THE SECRETARY SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS FOR PHARMACY
BENEFITS MANAGERS THAT CONTRACT WITH MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATIONS THAT
ESTABLISH REQUIREMENTS FOR CONDUCTING AUDITS OF PHARMACIES OR
PHARMACISTS THAT ARE:
(1) TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, SUBSTANTIVELY SIMILAR TO THE
AUDIT PROVISIONS UNDER § 15–1629 OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE; AND
(2) CONSISTENT WITH FEDERAL LAW.
(DD) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH MECHANISMS FOR:
(I) IDENTIFYING A PROGRAM RECIPIENT’S PRIMARY CARE
PROVIDER AT THE TIME OF ENROLLMENT INTO A MANAGED CARE PROGRAM; AND
(II) MAINTAINING CONTINUITY OF CARE WITH THE PRIMARY
CARE PROVIDER IF:
1. THE PROVIDER HAS A CONTRACT WITH A MANAGED
CARE ORGANIZATION OR A CONTRACTED MEDICAL GROUP OF A MANAGED CARE
ORGANIZATION TO PROVIDE PRIMARY CARE SERVICES; AND
2. THE RECIPIENT DESIRES TO CONTINUE CARE WITH
THE PROVIDER.
(2) IF A PROGRAM RECIPIENT ENROLLS IN A MANAGED CARE
ORGANIZATION AND REQUESTS ASSIGNMENT TO A PARTICULAR PRIMARY CARE
PROVIDER WHO HAS A CONTRACT WITH THE MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION OR A
CONTRACTED GROUP OF THE MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION, THE MANAGED CARE
ORGANIZATION SHALL ASSIGN THE RECIPIENT TO THE PRIMARY CARE PROVIDER.
– 42 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 865
(3) (I) A PROGRAM RECIPIENT MAY REQUEST A CHANGE OF
PRIMARY CARE PROVIDERS WITHIN THE SAME MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION AT
ANY TIME.
(II) IF THE PRIMARY CARE PROVIDER HAS A CONTRACT WITH
THE MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION OR A CONTRACTED GROUP OF THE MANAGED
CARE ORGANIZATION, THE MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION SHALL HONOR A
REQUEST MADE UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
(4) IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE FEDERAL HEALTH CARE FINANCING
ADMINISTRATION’S GUIDELINES, A PROGRAM RECIPIENT MAY ELECT TO
DISENROLL FROM A MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION IF THE MANAGED CARE
ORGANIZATION TERMINATES ITS CONTRACT WITH THE DEPARTMENT.
(5) A PROGRAM RECIPIENT MAY DISENROLL FROM A MANAGED CARE
ORGANIZATION TO MAINTAIN CONTINUITY OF CARE WITH A PRIMARY CARE
PROVIDER IF:
(I) THE CONTRACT BETWEEN THE PRIMARY CARE PROVIDER
AND THE MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION OR CONTRACTED GROUP OF THE
MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION TERMINATES BECAUSE:
1. THE MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION OR
CONTRACTED GROUP OF THE MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION TERMINATES THE
PROVIDER’S CONTRACT FOR A REASON OTHER THAN QUALITY OF CARE OR THE
PROVIDER’S FAILURE TO COMPLY WITH CONTRACTUAL REQUIREMENTS RELATED
TO QUALITY ASSURANCE ACTIVITIES;
2. A. THE MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION OR
CONTRACTED GROUP OF THE MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION REDUCES THE
PRIMARY CARE PROVIDER’S CAPITATED OR APPLICABLE FEE FOR SERVICES RATES;
B. THE REDUCTION IN RATES IS GREATER THAN THE
ACTUAL CHANGE IN RATES OR CAPITATION PAID TO THE MANAGED CARE
ORGANIZATION BY THE DEPARTMENT; AND
C. THE PROVIDER AND THE MANAGED CARE
ORGANIZATION OR CONTRACTED GROUP OF THE MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION
ARE UNABLE TO NEGOTIATE A MUTUALLY ACCEPTABLE RATE; OR
3. THE PROVIDER CONTRACT BETWEEN THE PROVIDER
AND THE MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION IS TERMINATED BECAUSE THE MANAGED
CARE ORGANIZATION IS ACQUIRED BY ANOTHER ENTITY; AND
– 43 –

Ch. 865 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) 1. THE PROGRAM RECIPIENT DESIRES TO CONTINUE TO
RECEIVE CARE FROM THE PRIMARY CARE PROVIDER;
2. THE PROVIDER CONTRACTS WITH AT LEAST ONE
OTHER MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION OR CONTRACTED GROUP OF A MANAGED
CARE ORGANIZATION; AND
3. THE ENROLLEE NOTIFIES THE DEPARTMENT OR THE
DEPARTMENT’S DESIGNEE OF THE ENROLLEE’S INTENTION WITHIN 90 DAYS AFTER
THE CONTRACT TERMINATION.
(6) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE TIMELY NOTIFICATION TO
THE AFFECTED MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION OF AN ENROLLEE’S INTENTION TO
DISENROLL UNDER THE PROVISIONS OF PARAGRAPH (5) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
REVISOR’S NOTE: This section formerly was § 15–103(b)(1) through (26) and (29)
through (33) and (f) of this subtitle.
In subsection (b)(1)(ii), the phrase “at least” was added for clarity.
In subsection (c), the reference to the “Maryland Children’s Health Program”
was deleted and duplicative language for Maryland Children’s Health
Program has been added as § 15–306 of this title to reflect the organization of
this title.
In subsection (i)(1)(xviii), the phrase “tab on the State–designated health
information exchange website required under § 19–145.1(b)(2)(iv) of this
article” was substituted for the former phrase “after the tab on the
State–designated health information exchange website required under §
19–145(b)(2)(iv) of this article is developed” to reflect that the tab has been
developed and to correct an erroneous cross–reference.
In subsections (i)(3)(v)5 and (v)(4), the phrase “program established under
subsection (a) of this section” was substituted for the former references to the
“Maryland Medicaid Managed Care Program” and the “HealthChoice
Program”, respectively, for consistency throughout this section.
In subsection (dd)(3)(ii), the phrase “made under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph” was added for clarity.
Throughout this section, the term “substance use disorder” is substituted for
the former references to “substance abuse” and “alcohol and drug abuse” and
“with substance use disorders” is substituted for the former reference to
– 44 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 865
“substance abusing” to update terminology to that used currently in the
behavioral health community.
The only other changes were in style.
15–103.2.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “COMMITTEE” MEANS THE MARYLAND MEDICAID
ADVISORY COMMITTEE.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH THE MARYLAND MEDICAID
ADVISORY COMMITTEE.
(C) (1) THE COMMITTEE SHALL BE COMPOSED OF NOT MORE THAN 25
MEMBERS.
(2) THE MAJORITY OF THE MEMBERS OF THE COMMITTEE SHALL BE
ENROLLEES OR ENROLLEE ADVOCATES.
(3) AT LEAST FIVE MEMBERS OF THE COMMITTEE SHALL BE
ENROLLEES REPRESENTATIVE OF THE ENTIRE MEDICAID POPULATION.
(4) THE COMMITTEE MEMBERS SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) AT LEAST FIVE CURRENT OR FORMER ENROLLEES OR THE
PARENTS OR GUARDIANS OF CURRENT OR FORMER ENROLLEES;
(II) PROVIDERS WHO ARE FAMILIAR WITH THE MEDICAL NEEDS
OF LOW–INCOME POPULATION GROUPS, INCLUDING BOARD–CERTIFIED
PHYSICIANS;
(III) HOSPITAL REPRESENTATIVES;
(IV) AT LEAST FIVE BUT NOT MORE THAN 10 ADVOCATES FOR
THE MEDICAID POPULATION, INCLUDING REPRESENTATIVES OF SPECIAL NEEDS
POPULATIONS, SUCH AS:
1. CHILDREN WITH SPECIAL NEEDS;
2. INDIVIDUALS WITH PHYSICAL DISABILITIES;
3. INDIVIDUALS WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES;
– 45 –

Ch. 865 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
4. INDIVIDUALS WITH MENTAL ILLNESS;
5. INDIVIDUALS WITH BRAIN INJURIES;
6. MEDICAID AND MEDICARE DUAL ELIGIBLES;
7. INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE HOMELESS OR HAVE
EXPERIENCED HOMELESSNESS;
8. INDIVIDUALS ENROLLED IN HOME– AND
COMMUNITY–BASED SERVICES WAIVERS;
9. ELDERLY INDIVIDUALS;
10. LOW–INCOME INDIVIDUALS AND INDIVIDUALS
RECEIVING BENEFITS THROUGH THE TEMPORARY ASSISTANCE FOR NEEDY
FAMILIES PROGRAM; AND
11. INDIVIDUALS RECEIVING SUBSTANCE USE
TREATMENT SERVICES;
(V) TWO MEMBERS OF THE SENATE FINANCE COMMITTEE,
APPOINTED BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE; AND
(VI) THREE MEMBERS OF THE HOUSE OF DELEGATES,
APPOINTED BY THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE.
(5) A DESIGNEE OF EACH OF THE FOLLOWING SHALL SERVE AS AN EX
OFFICIO MEMBER OF THE COMMITTEE:
(I) THE SECRETARY OF HUMAN SERVICES;
(II) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE MARYLAND HEALTH
CARE COMMISSION; AND
(III) THE MARYLAND ASSOCIATION OF COUNTY HEALTH
OFFICERS.
(6) THE SECRETARY SHALL APPOINT NONVOTING MEMBERS FROM
MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATIONS WHO MAY PARTICIPATE IN COMMITTEE
MEETINGS, UNLESS THE COMMITTEE MEETS IN CLOSED SESSION AS PROVIDED IN §
3–305 OF THE GENERAL PROVISIONS ARTICLE.
– 46 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 865
(7) (I) EXCEPT AS SPECIFIED IN PARAGRAPHS (4)(V) AND (VI) AND
(5) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE MEMBERS OF THE COMMITTEE SHALL BE APPOINTED
BY THE SECRETARY AND SERVE FOR A 4–YEAR TERM.
(II) IN MAKING APPOINTMENTS TO THE COMMITTEE, THE
SECRETARY SHALL PROVIDE FOR CONTINUITY AND ROTATION.
(III) IN APPOINTING CONSUMER MEMBERS TO THE COMMITTEE,
THE SECRETARY SHALL SEEK RECOMMENDATIONS FROM:
1. THE STATE PROTECTION AND ADVOCACY SYSTEM
ORGANIZATION;
2. THE STATEWIDE INDEPENDENT LIVING COUNCIL;
3. THE DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES COUNCIL;
4. THE DEPARTMENT OF DISABILITIES;
5. THE DEPARTMENT OF AGING;
6. CONSUMER ADVOCACY ORGANIZATIONS; AND
7. THE PUBLIC.
(D) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A
MEMBER OF THE COMMITTEE:
(I) MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION; BUT
(II) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER
THE STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE
BUDGET.
(2) A MEMBER OF THE COMMITTEE WHO IS AN ENROLLEE IS
ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR:
(I) EXPENSES FOR PERSONAL AND DEPENDENT CARE
INCURRED DURING THE MEETING AND DURING TRAVEL TIME TO AND FROM THE
MEETING;
– 47 –

Ch. 865 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) EXPENSES FOR COGNITIVE SUPPORTS RELATED TO THE
MEETING; AND
(III) APPROPRIATE TRANSPORTATION TO AND FROM THE
MEETING.
(3) ON REQUEST, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE FOR A
DEDICATED DEPARTMENT STAFF PERSON:
(I) TO REVIEW MEETING MATERIALS WITH ENROLLEE
MEMBERS IN ADVANCE OF A MEETING BY TELEPHONE OR IN PERSON; AND
(II) TO PROVIDE REFERRALS TO ADVOCACY ORGANIZATIONS.
(E) (1) THE SECRETARY SHALL APPOINT THE CHAIR OF THE
COMMITTEE.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE STAFF FOR THE COMMITTEE.
(3) THE COMMITTEE SHALL DETERMINE THE TIMES AND PLACES OF
ITS MEETINGS.
(4) (I) THE CHAIR OF THE COMMITTEE AND THE STAFF FOR THE
COMMITTEE SHALL PROVIDE THE AGENDA, MINUTES, AND ANY WRITTEN
MATERIALS TO BE PRESENTED OR DISCUSSED AT A MEETING TO THE MEMBERS OF
THE COMMITTEE AT LEAST 5 DAYS BEFORE THE MEETING.
(II) THE AGENDA, MINUTES, AND WRITTEN MATERIALS SHALL
BE PROVIDED TO MEMBERS OF THE COMMITTEE IN A MANNER AND FORMAT THAT
REASONABLY ACCOMMODATES THE SPECIFIC NEEDS OF THE MEMBER.
(F) IN ADDITION TO ANY DUTIES IMPOSED BY FEDERAL LAW AND
REGULATION, THE COMMITTEE SHALL:
(1) ADVISE THE SECRETARY ON THE IMPLEMENTATION, OPERATION,
AND EVALUATION OF MANAGED CARE PROGRAMS UNDER THIS SECTION;
(2) REVIEW AND MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS ON THE REGULATIONS
DEVELOPED TO IMPLEMENT MANAGED CARE PROGRAMS UNDER § 15–103.1 OF THIS
SUBTITLE;
– 48 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 865
(3) REVIEW AND MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS ON THE STANDARDS
USED IN CONTRACTS BETWEEN THE DEPARTMENT AND MANAGED CARE
ORGANIZATIONS;
(4) REVIEW AND MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS ON THE DEPARTMENT’S
OVERSIGHT OF QUALITY ASSURANCE STANDARDS;
(5) REVIEW DATA COLLECTED BY THE DEPARTMENT FROM MANAGED
CARE ORGANIZATIONS PARTICIPATING IN THE PROGRAM AND DATA COLLECTED BY
THE MARYLAND HEALTH CARE COMMISSION;
(6) PROMOTE THE DISSEMINATION OF MANAGED CARE
ORGANIZATION PERFORMANCE INFORMATION, INCLUDING LOSS RATIOS, TO
ENROLLEES IN A MANNER THAT FACILITATES QUALITY COMPARISONS AND USES
LAYMAN’S LANGUAGE;
(7) ASSIST THE DEPARTMENT IN EVALUATING THE ENROLLMENT
PROCESS; AND
(8) REVIEW REPORTS OF THE OMBUDSMEN.
REVISOR’S NOTE: This section formerly was § 15–103(b)(27) of this subtitle.
Subsection (a) is new language added to state expressly that which only was
implied in the former § 15–103(b)(27), that references to “the Committee” were
references to the Maryland Medicaid Advisory Committee.
In subsection (c)(4)(iv)11, the term “substance use” is substituted for the
former reference to “substance abuse” to update terminology to that used
currently in the behavioral health community.
In subsection (c)(7)(i), the reference to paragraph (4)(v) and (vi) was
substituted for the former reference to paragraph (4) for clarity.
The only other changes were in style.
15–103.5.
(b) (1) The Department shall pay all fines collected under [§ 15–103(b)(12)(v)]
§ 15–103.1(I)(3)(V) of this subtitle and penalties collected under [§ 15–103.7(e)(2)(iv)] §
15–103.9(E)(2)(IV) of this subtitle to the Comptroller of the State.
15–103.8.
– 49 –

Ch. 865 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) (2) Except as provided in [§ 15–103.8] § 15–103.10 of this subtitle, the
Department is not required to adopt regulations under paragraph (1) of this subsection for
any change that may be made through a process other than the regulatory process.
15–109.
(b) Except as provided in [§ 15–103(a)(2)(ii)] § 15–103(B)(2) of this subtitle, to
determine eligibility under the Program, the Department annually shall set the allowable
yearly income levels in amounts at least equal to the following:
(1) Family of 1 – $2,500.
(2) Family of 2 – $3,000.
(3) Family of 3 – $3,500.
(4) Family of 4 – $4,000.
(5) Family of 5 or more – $4,500 plus an increase of $500 for each family
member in excess of 5.
15–148.
(a) Except for a drug or device for which the U.S. Food and Drug Administration
has issued a black box warning, the Program [and the Maryland Children’s Health
Program] may not apply a prior authorization requirement for a contraceptive drug or
device that is:
(1) (i) An intrauterine device; or
(ii) An implantable rod;
(2) Approved by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration; and
(3) Obtained under a prescription written by an authorized prescriber.
(b) The Program [and the Maryland Children’s Health Program] shall provide
coverage for a single dispensing to an enrollee of a supply of prescription contraceptives for
a 12–month period.
15–152.
(a) The Program [and the Maryland Children’s Health Program] shall provide
coverage for services rendered to an enrollee by a licensed pharmacist acting within the
pharmacist’s lawful scope of practice to the same extent as services rendered by any other
licensed health care provider.
– 50 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 865
(b) Reimbursement for services provided under subsection (a) of this section may
not be conditioned on whether the licensed pharmacist is:
(1) Employed by a physician, pharmacy, or facility; or
(2) Acting under a physician’s orders.
15–158.
The Program [and the Maryland Children’s Health Program] may not require prior
authorization for a transfer to a special pediatric hospital.
15–301.
(b) The Maryland Children’s Health Program shall provide, subject to the
limitations of the State budget and any other requirements imposed by the State and as
permitted by federal law or waiver, comprehensive medical care and other health care
services to an individual who:
(1) Does not qualify for coverage under [§ 15–103(a)(2)] § 15–103(B) of
this title; and
15–304.
(b) (2) In addition to the school–based outreach program established under
subsection (a) of this section, the Department, in consultation with the Maryland Medicaid
Advisory Committee established under [§ 15–103(b)] § 15–103.2 of this title, shall develop
mechanisms for outreach for the program with a special emphasis on identifying children
who may be eligible for program benefits under the Maryland Children’s Health Program
established under § 15–301 of this subtitle.
15–305.
(A) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2025, SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS OF
THE STATE BUDGET AND AS PERMITTED BY FEDERAL LAW, THE DEPARTMENT:
(1) SHALL ESTABLISH AN EXPRESS LANE ELIGIBILITY PROGRAM TO
ENROLL INDIVIDUALS IN THE PROGRAM AND THE MARYLAND CHILDREN’S HEALTH
PROGRAM BASED ON ELIGIBILITY FINDINGS BY THE SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM;
(2) MAY NOT CONSIDER ANY OTHER INCOME OR ELIGIBILITY
REQUIREMENTS;
– 51 –

Ch. 865 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) TO THE EXTENT THAT A WAIVER IS NEEDED TO MAXIMIZE THE
NUMBER OF STATE RESIDENTS WHO MAY QUALIFY FOR THE EXPRESS LANE
ELIGIBILITY PROGRAM, SHALL APPLY TO THE CENTERS FOR MEDICARE AND
MEDICAID SERVICES FOR ONE OR MORE WAIVERS UNDER § 1115 OF THE FEDERAL
SOCIAL SECURITY ACT TO IMPLEMENT THE EXPRESS LANE ELIGIBILITY PROGRAM;
AND
(4) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, SHALL MAKE ALL
REASONABLE EFFORTS TO EXPEDITE ENROLLMENT OF ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUALS IN
THE EXPRESS LANE ELIGIBILITY PROGRAM.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT MAY PROPOSE OR IMPLEMENT THE USE OF EXPRESS
LANE ELIGIBILITY FOR RENEWALS BEFORE PROPOSING OR IMPLEMENTING THE
USE OF EXPRESS LANE ELIGIBILITY FOR INITIAL ENROLLMENT.
REVISOR’S NOTE: This section repeats the provisions of § 15–103(a)(5) of this title,
as it relates to the Maryland Children’s Health Program, to reflect the
organization of the title.
15–306.
SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS OF THE STATE BUDGET AND AS PERMITTED BY
FEDERAL LAW OR WAIVER, THE MARYLAND CHILDREN’S HEALTH PROGRAM MAY
PROVIDE GUARANTEED ELIGIBILITY FOR EACH ENROLLEE FOR UP TO 6 MONTHS
UNLESS AN ENROLLEE OBTAINS HEALTH INSURANCE THROUGH ANOTHER SOURCE.
REVISOR’S NOTE: This section repeats the provisions of § 15–103(b)(3) of this title,
as it relates to the Maryland Children’s Health Program, to reflect the
organization of the title.
15–307.
(A) EXCEPT FOR A DRUG OR DEVICE FOR WHICH THE U.S. FOOD AND DRUG
ADMINISTRATION HAS ISSUED A BLACK BOX WARNING, THE MARYLAND
CHILDREN’S HEALTH PROGRAM MAY NOT APPLY A PRIOR AUTHORIZATION
REQUIREMENT FOR A CONTRACEPTIVE DRUG OR DEVICE THAT IS:
(1) (I) AN INTRAUTERINE DEVICE; OR
(II) AN IMPLANTABLE ROD;
(2) APPROVED BY THE U.S. FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION; AND
– 52 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 865
(3) OBTAINED UNDER A PRESCRIPTION WRITTEN BY AN AUTHORIZED
PRESCRIBER.
(B) THE MARYLAND CHILDREN’S HEALTH PROGRAM SHALL PROVIDE
COVERAGE FOR A SINGLE DISPENSING TO AN ENROLLEE OF A SUPPLY OF
PRESCRIPTION CONTRACEPTIVES FOR A 12–MONTH PERIOD.
REVISOR’S NOTE: This section repeats the provisions of § 15–148 of this title, as it
relates to the Maryland Children’s Health Program, to reflect the organization
of the title.
15–308.
(A) THE MARYLAND CHILDREN’S HEALTH PROGRAM SHALL PROVIDE
COVERAGE FOR SERVICES RENDERED TO AN ENROLLEE BY A LICENSED
PHARMACIST ACTING WITHIN THE PHARMACIST’S LAWFUL SCOPE OF PRACTICE TO
THE SAME EXTENT AS SERVICES RENDERED BY ANY OTHER LICENSED HEALTH CARE
PROVIDER.
(B) REIMBURSEMENT FOR SERVICES PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF
THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONDITIONED ON WHETHER THE LICENSED PHARMACIST
IS:
(1) EMPLOYED BY A PHYSICIAN, PHARMACY, OR FACILITY; OR
(2) ACTING UNDER A PHYSICIAN’S ORDERS.
REVISOR’S NOTE: This section repeats the provisions of § 15–152 of this title, as it
relates to the Maryland Children’s Health Program, to reflect the organization
of the title.
15–309.
THE MARYLAND CHILDREN’S HEALTH PROGRAM MAY NOT REQUIRE PRIOR
AUTHORIZATION FOR A TRANSFER TO A SPECIAL PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL.
REVISOR’S NOTE: This section repeats the provisions of § 15–158 of this title, as it
relates to the Maryland Children’s Health Program, to reflect the organization
of the title.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That it is the intent of the General
Assembly that, except as expressly provided in this Act, this Act shall be construed as a
nonsubstantive revision and may not otherwise be construed to render any substantive
change in the law of the State.
– 53 –

Ch. 865 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Revisor’s Notes contained
in this Act are not law and may not be considered to have been enacted as part of this Act.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the publisher of the
Annotated Code of Maryland, in consultation with and subject to the approval of the
Department of Legislative Services, shall correct, with no further action required by the
General Assembly, cross–references and terminology rendered incorrect by this Act or by
any other Act of the General Assembly of 2026 that affects provisions enacted by this Act.
The publisher shall adequately describe any correction that is made in an editor’s note
following the section affected.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Enacted under Article II, § 17(c) of the Maryland Constitution, May 31, 2026.
– 54 –